California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable
 obligation to the user, vendor, or other person liable for the tax.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the user, vendor, or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the taxpayer and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by electronic transmission or other electronic technology to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 21.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8958.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board determines upon receiving information from a user or other person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for tax as pursuant to Section 8957 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating evidence
 furnished by the person liable for the tax.

(b) Upon its determination, the board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the
 determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the tax is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the board thereof.

(f) If under this section an amount that was
 withheld and not remitted to the board is final and due and payable by the employer, and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Tax [8971. - 8973.]

8971.

At any time within three years after any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected becomes due and payable and at any time within three years after the delinquency of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected, or within the period during which a lien is in force as the result of the filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board may bring an action in the courts of this state, of any other state, or of the United States in the name of the state to collect the amount delinquent together with penalties and interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 947, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

8972.

In the action a writ of attachment may be issued in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure without the showing required by Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

8973.

In the action a certificate by the board showing the delinquency shall be prima facie evidence of the levy of the tax, of the delinquency of the amount of tax, interest, and penalty set forth, and of compliance by the board with all provisions of this part in relation to the computation and levy of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Lien of Tax [8991. - 8996.]

8991.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 8996, the excise tax, interest, and penalties are a lien upon and have the effect of an execution duly levied against any motor vehicle in which fuel taxable under this part is used and against any personal property of the user.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

8992.

The lien arising under Section 8991 attaches at the time a vehicle is operated in this state through the use of fuel taxable under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

8993.

The lien arising under Section 8991 shall not be removed until the excise tax, interest, and penalties are paid or the vehicle or other property subject to the lien is sold in payment thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

8994.

The lien arising under Section 8991 as to the tax and interest, but exclusive of penalties, upon personal property is paramount to all private liens or encumbrances of whatever character, and to the rights of any conditional vendor or any other holder of the legal title, in or to any motor vehicle which is operated in this state through the use of fuel taxable under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

8995.

The Department of Motor Vehicles may transfer the registered ownership of any motor vehicle using fuel taxable under this part only after a certificate of excise tax clearance has been issued by the board. The certificate may be issued after the payment of all amounts due under this part, according to the records of the board as of the date of the certificate, or after the payment of the amounts is secured to the satisfaction of the board.

An excise tax clearance certificate shall not be required to transfer the registered ownership of a passenger vehicle as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 260.)
-------------------------------------------

8996.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed under this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. 

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts disclosed
 on a return received by the board before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent;

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the board;

(3) For amounts determined under Section 8826 (pertaining to jeopardy assessments), the date the notice of the board’s finding is mailed or issued;

(4) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Warrant for Collection of Tax [9001. - 9003.]

9001.

At any time within three years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount herein required to be paid or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be
 levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy of and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 145.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

The board may pay or advance to the sheriff or marshal, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 146.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1782.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Seizure and Sale [9011. - 9014.]

9011.

Whenever any user is delinquent in the payment of the obligations imposed under this part, the board or its authorized representative may collect the amount due in the following manner: The board may seize any property, real or personal, subject to the lien of the tax and thereafter sell the property, or a sufficient part of it, at public auction to pay the tax due together with any interest and penalties imposed for the delinquency and any cost incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.

Notice of the sale and the time and place thereof shall be given in writing to the delinquent user and to all persons who have an interest of record in the property seized at least 20 days before the date set for the sale. The notice shall be personally served or enclosed in an envelope addressed to the user or other person at his or her last known residence or place of business in this state. If not personally served, the notice shall be deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the property
 or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property or a part thereof is located. Notice shall also be posted in both of the following manners:

(a) One public place in the city in which the interest in property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest in the property is to be sold.

(b) One conspicuous place on the property.

The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the amount due, including tax, penalties, interest, and costs, the name of the user, and the further statement that unless the amount is paid on or before the time fixed in the notice of sale, the property, or so much of it as may be
 necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1528, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.5.

The board may seize any motor vehicle subject to the lien of the tax and thereafter sell the vehicle at private sale to pay the tax due, together with any interest and penalties imposed for the delinquency and any cost incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.6.

Notice of the sale shall be given in writing to the delinquent user and to all persons appearing of record to have an interest in the motor vehicle at least 10 days before the date set for the sale of the vehicle. The notice shall be enclosed in an envelope addressed to the user at his last known residence or place of business and, in the case of any person appearing of record to have an interest in the motor vehicle, addressed to the person at his last known residence or place of business. It shall be deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall contain a description of the motor vehicle to be sold, a statement of the amount due, interest,
 penalties and costs, the name of the user, and the further statement that unless the tax due, interest, penalties and costs are paid within 10 days the motor vehicle will be sold at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9013.

At any sale the board or its authorized agent shall sell the property in accordance with the law and the notice and shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the user.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9014.

If upon any sale the moneys received exceed the amount due to the state from the user, the board shall return the excess to the user and obtain his or her receipt. If any person having an interest in or lien upon the property files with the board prior to the sale notice of his or her interest or lien, the board shall withhold payment of any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties thereto by a court of competent jurisdiction. If for any reason the receipt of the user is not available, the board shall deposit the excess moneys
 with the Controller, as trustee for the user, subject to the order of the user, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Successor Withholding and Liability [9021. - 9024.]

9021.

If any vendor liable for any amount under this part sells out his or her business or stock of goods or quits the business, his or her successor or assigns shall withhold from the purchase price an amount sufficient to cover that amount until the former owner produces a receipt from the board showing that it has been paid or a certificate stating that no amount is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 13.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

9022.

(a) If the purchaser of a business or stock of goods fails to withhold the purchase price as required, he or she becomes personally liable for the payment of the amount required to be withheld by him or her to the extent of the purchase price valued in money. 

(b) (1) Within 60 days after the latest of the dates specified in paragraph (2), the board shall either issue the certificate or mail notice to the purchaser at his or her address as it appears on the records of the board of the amount that must be paid as a
 condition of issuing the certificate. 

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the latest of the following dates shall apply: 

(A) The date the board receives a written request from the purchaser for a certificate. 

(B) The date of the sale of the business or stock of goods. 

(C) The date the former owner’s records are made available for audit. 

(c) Failure of the board to mail the notice referred to in subdivision (b) shall release the purchaser from any further obligation to withhold from the purchase price under this article. The last date upon which the obligation of the successor may be enforced shall be not later than three years after the date the board is notified of the purchase of the
 business or stock of goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 13.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

9023.

The certificate may be issued after the payment of all amounts due under this part, according to the records of the board as of the date of the certificate, or after the payment of the amounts is secured to the satisfaction of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1361, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

9024.

The obligation of the successor shall be enforced by serving a notice of successor liability on the person. The notice shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of a notice of a deficiency determination, not later than three years after the date the board is notified of the purchase of the business or stock of goods. The successor may petition for reconsideration in the manner provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 8851) of Chapter 4. The notice shall become final and the amount due and payable in the manner provided in that article except that no additional penalty shall apply if not paid when due and payable. This chapter, with
 respect to the collection of any amount required to be paid under this part, shall apply when the notice becomes final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 74, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Miscellaneous Provisions [9031. - 9036.]

9031.

The remedies of the State provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the board constitutes an election by the State to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9032.

The board shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the board a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9033.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any taxes due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the board and the taxpayer may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the board, the board may terminate the agreement by
 mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of his or her right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the tax, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The board shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of taxes, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy. 

(e) Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within 45 days from the date on which the board’s notice of determination or redetermination becomes final, and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the board shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 8854.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9033.5.

The board, beginning no later than January 1, 2001, shall provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 9033 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year, and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9035.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of tax, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount less than or equal to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other tax imposed by this part.

(d) (1) If the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee shall file with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a)
 shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other tax imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 18.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9036.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may provide
 service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section
 shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 4.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Overpayments and Refunds [9151. - 9196.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [9151. - 9156.]

9151.

If the department determines that any amount not required to be paid under this part has been paid by any person, the department shall set forth that fact in its records and certify the amount paid in excess of the amount legally due and the person by whom the excess was paid to the department or from whom it was collected. The excess amount paid or collected shall be credited on any amounts then due and payable from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall either be refunded to the person, or the person’s successors, administrators, executors, or assigns, or, if authorized by the department, deducted by the person from any amounts to become due from that person under this part.

Any overpayment of
 the tax by a user to a vendor who is required to collect the tax and who gives the user a receipt therefor pursuant to Section 8732 shall be credited or refunded by the state to the user.

For any amount exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the department’s determination under this section shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of the determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 22.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9151.5.

When an amount represented by a person who is a taxpayer under this part to a customer as constituting reimbursement for taxes due under this part is computed upon an amount that is not taxable or is in excess of the taxable amount and is actually paid by the customer to the person, the amount so paid shall be returned by the person to the customer upon notification by the Board of Equalization or by the customer that the excess has been ascertained. If the person fails or refuses to do so, the amount so paid, if knowingly or mistakenly computed by the person
 upon an amount that is not taxable or is in excess of the taxable amount, shall be remitted by that person to this state. Those amounts remitted to the state shall be credited by the board on any amounts due and payable under this part on the same transaction from the person by whom it was paid to this state and the balance, if any, shall constitute an obligation due from the person to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no refund shall be approved by the board after three years from the last day of the month following the reporting period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to determinations made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 8776), Article 3 (commencing with Section 8801), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 8826) of Chapter 4, after six months from the date the determinations became final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires later, unless a
 claim therefor is filed with the board within that period. No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of that period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within that period or unless the claim relates to a period for which a waiver has been given pursuant to Section 8783.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 8783 if a claim therefor is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 9152 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.2.

Notwithstanding Section 9152, a refund of an overpayment of any tax, penalty, or interest collected by the board by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.3.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Sections 9152 and 9153 that is made in the case in which the amount of tax determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of tax determined” means an amount of tax, interest, or penalty, with
 respect to a single determination made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 8776), Article 3 (commencing with Section 8801), or Article 4 (commencing with Section 8826) of Chapter 4.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 98, Sec. 2.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9153.

The claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which it is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9155.

Interest shall be paid upon any overpayment of any amount of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5 from the first day of the calendar month following the period during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the person making the overpayment with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In
 the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month following the date upon which the person making the overpayment, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9156.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Refund [9171. - 9175.]

9171.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this State or against any officer of the State to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any excise tax or other amounts required to be collected or to prevent or enjoin the revocation of any permit issued under this part or any other action whereby it is sought to enforce the payment of any excise tax or other amounts required to be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 870.)
-------------------------------------------

9172.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally assessed or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9173.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9173.5.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9173.6.

Failure to bring suit or action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the State on account of any alleged overpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

9174.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any amounts due from the plaintiff under this part, Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301), and Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001), and the balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff. In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5 upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of
 the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9175.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any amount paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the user.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [9181. - 9184.]

9181.

(a) The board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering any
 erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 8776) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 8826) of Chapter 4. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9182.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 9181, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9183.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 9181, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9184.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the department finds that neither the person liable for payment of tax nor any party related to that person has in any way caused an erroneous refund for which an action for recovery is provided under Section 9181, no interest shall be imposed on the amount of that erroneous refund until 30 days after the date on which the department serves a notice of determination for repayment of the erroneous refund to the person. The act of filing a claim for refund shall not be considered as causing the erroneous refund.

(b) This section shall be operative for any action for recovery under Section 9181 on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 31.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cancellations [9196. - 9196.]

9196.

If any amount has been illegally determined either by the person filing the return or by the department, the department shall set forth that fact in its records, certify the amount determined to be in excess of the amount legally due and the person against whom the determination was made, and authorize the cancellation of the amount upon the records of the department. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 23.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Administration [9251. - 9278.]


